Utah statutes.
53A-8a-301.   Evaluation of employee performance.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a local school board shall require that the performance of each school district employee be evaluated annually in accordance with rules of the State Board of Education adopted in accordance with this chapter and Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(2) (a)  Rules adopted by the State Board of Education under Subsection (1) may include an exemption from annual performance evaluations for temporary or part-time employees.

(b)  As provided by Section 53A-8a-405, a provisional or probationary educator shall be evaluated at least twice each school year.

